Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROBERT STREET VIADUCT REPLACEMENT; CONTINGENT APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Project" means the replacement of the viaduct and associated reconstruction projects in the area, including but not limited to reconstruction of Robert Street from Page Street to Cesar Chavez Street, updating pedestrian crossings, improving sidewalks and trails, improving transit access, improving lighting, and providing additional community-desired amenities. new text end new text begin (c) "RAISE grant" means the $25,000,000 Rebuilding American Infrastructure with Sustainability and Equity grant awarded to the Department of Transportation by USDOT in January 2025 to complete the project. new text end new text begin (d) "USDOT" means the United States Department of Transportation. new text end new text begin (e) "Viaduct" means the George Street bridge and adjacent retaining walls over Robert Street in the city of St. Paul. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Trunk highway fund; appropriation. new text end new text begin If the RAISE grant is rescinded by USDOT, $21,200,000 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation to complete the portions of the project eligible for the use of trunk highway funds. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin General fund; appropriation. new text end new text begin If the RAISE grant is rescinded by USDOT, $3,800,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to complete the portions of the project ineligible for the use of trunk highway funds. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end